 246  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 arbitrary power had been the ideal guiding the American Revolution, while the freedom to “pursue happiness” became the ideal driving the new nation. To ensure their new freedoms, the Revolutionaries wrestled with a ­fundamental question: what is the proper role and scope of government? In answering that question, they eventually developed new ways to divide and balance power among the various branches of government so as to manage the tensions between ensuring liberty and maintaining order. But even with victory in the war, America was a nation in name only. The quest for true nationhood after the Revolution was the most significant political transformation in modern history, for Americans would insist that sovereignty (ultimate power) resided not with a king or an aristocracy but with “the people,” the mass of ordinary citizens.

 forging a new nation

 The unlikely American victory in the Revolutionary War stunned the world, but the Patriots had little time to celebrate. As Alexander Hamilton, a brilliant young army officer turned congressman, noted in 1783, “We have now happily concluded the great work of independence, but much remains to be done to reach the fruits of it.” The transition from war to peace was neither simple nor easy. America was independent but it was not yet a s­ elf-​­sustaining nation. In fact, the Declaration of Independence never mentioned the word nation. Its official title was “the unanimous Declaration of the thirteen united States of America.” During the war, James Madison of Virginia predicted that the Confederation government would be only temporary. “The present Union will but little survive the present war,” he wrote. The states must recognize, he continued, “the necessity of the Union during the war” and “its probable dissolution after it.” Forging a new nation out of a confederation of thirteen rebellious ­colonies-​ ­turned-“­free-​­and-​­independent” states posed huge challenges, not the least of which was managing what George Washington called a “deranged” economy, suffocating in w ­ ar-​­related debts. The accumulated war debt was $160 million, a huge amount at the time, amounting to the total national budget over the twenty years from 1790 to 1810. Such financial stress made for trying times in the first years of the American republic. The period from the drafting of the Declaration of Independence in 1776, through the creation of the new federal constitution in 1787, and ending with the election of Thomas Jefferson as president in 1800, was fraught with instability and tension. From the start, the new nation experienced growing political divisions, economic distress, and foreign troubles. Three fundamental questions shaped political debate during the last quarter of the eighteenth century. Where would sovereignty reside in the new

The Confederation Government  247


 nation? What was the proper relationship of the states to each other and to the national government? And what was required for the new republic to flourish as an independent nation? The efforts to answer those questions created powerful tensions that continue to complicate American life.

The Confederation Government
 Young John Quincy Adams, a future president, called the years between 1783 and 1787 the “Critical Period” when American leaders developed sharp differences about economic policies, international relations, and the proper relationship of the states to the national government. Debates over those key issues unexpectedly gave birth to the nation’s first political parties and, to this day, continue to influence the American experiment in federalism (the sharing of power among national, state, and local governments). After the war, many Patriots who had feared government power and criticized British officials for abusing it now directed their attacks against the new state and national governments. In 1783, after Congress ran out of money, some army officers, upset at not being paid, had threatened to march on Congress and take over the government. Alexander Hamilton reported that the unpaid soldiers had become “a mob rather than an army, without clothing, without pay, without provisions [food], without morals, without discipline.” Only George Washington’s intervention stopped the rebellious officers from confronting Congress. At the same time, state legislatures desperate for funds to pay off their war debts sparked unrest and riots by raising taxes. The often violent clashes between the working poor and the state governments were a great disappointment to Washington, John Adams, and other Revolutionary leaders. For them and others disillusioned by the surge of “democratic” rebelliousness, the Critical Period was a time of hopes frustrated, a story shaded by regret at the absence of national loyalty and international respect. The weaknesses of the Articles of Confederation in dealing with the postwar turmoil led political leaders to design an entirely new national constitution and federal government.

 a loose alliance of states The Articles of Confederation, formally approved in 1781, had created a loose alliance (confederation) of thirteen independent and often squabbling and ungovernable states. The states were united only in theory; in practice, each state government acted on its own. The first major provision of the Articles insisted that “each state retains its sovereignty, freedom, and independence.” The weak national government under the Articles had only one component, a ­one-​­house legislature. There was no national president, no executive

 248  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 branch, no separate national judiciary (court system). State legislatures, not voters, appointed the members of the Confederation Congress, in which each state, regardless of size or population, had one vote. This meant that Rhode Island, with 68,000 people, had the same power in the Confederation Congress as Virginia, the largest and most prosperous state, with more than 747,000 inhabitants. George Washington called the Confederation “a h ­ alf-​­starved, limping government.” It could neither regulate trade, nor create taxes to pay off the country’s large war debts. It could approve treaties with other nations but had no power to enforce their terms. It could call for raising an army but could not force men to fill the ranks. The Congress, in short, could not enforce its own laws, and its budget relied on undependable “voluntary” contributions from the states. In 1782, for example, the Confederation asked the states to provide $8 million for the national government; they sent $420,000. The lack of state support forced the Confederation Congress to print paper money, called Continentals, whose value plummeted to two cents on the dollar as more and more were printed, leading to the joking phrase, “Not worth a Continental.” Virtually no gold and silver coins remained in circulation; they had all gone abroad to purchase items for the war. The Confederation government ran up a budget deficit every year of its existence. It was even hard to find people to serve in such a weak congress. And people openly doubted the stability of the new American republic. As John Adams wrote to Thomas Jefferson, “The Union is still to me an Object of as much Anxiety as ever independence was.” Yet in spite of its limitations, the Confederation Congress survived the war years while laying important foundations for the new national government. The Articles of Confederation were crucially important in supporting the political concept of republicanism (representative democracy), which meant that America would be governed not by kings or queens or nobles but “by the authority of the people,” whose elected representatives would make decisions on their behalf. The Confederation Congress also created the national government’s first executive departments and formulated the basic principles of land distribution and territorial government that would guide America’s westward expansion.

 land policy In ending the Revolutionary War and transferring Britain’s North American colonies to America, the Treaty of Paris doubled the size of the United States, extending the nation’s western boundary to the Mississippi River. Under the Articles of Confederation, land not included within the

The Confederation Government  249


 re nc eR ive

WESTERN LAND CESSIONS, 1781–1802 CANADA
(British) 
 r

 ME (Mass.)

S


 aw

Superio
 r Lake

La
 k ron Hu

Lake Michig
 an

 e

 VT e O nt Lak

 k La

 r

Ceded by
, 1786
Connecticut
 ve Ri

 our

 i Riv e r O hi o

 r Riv e

Riv


PENNSYLVANIA MD VIRGINIA

 er

■
■
■


 DE

ATLANTIC OCEAN

Ri
 ve



 r

I DA ( S
p a n i sh) 



 NJ

Altamaha
River


 ain Claimed by Sp to 1795



 RI

SOUTH CAROLINA

 GEORGIA



 MA

NORTH CAROLINA

Ceded by
North
Carolina,
 va nn ah

FL OR

 NH

NEW YORK

 e

Sa


Mis
 sis sip pi

Ceded to
France,


 se nnes e Te River

 LOUISIANA (Spanish)

 ri eE

Ceded by
Connecticut,


Illino
 is

 is s

 ari o

 CT

Ceded by
 ts, 1785 Massachuset

M


L
 t.

200 Miles


200 Kilometers


Ceded by New York, 1781
Ceded by Virginia, 1784 and 1792
Ceded by South Carolina to Georgia, 1787
Ceded by Georgia, 1802
 States with no western claims

 Why were there so many overlapping claims to the western lands? What were the key terms of the Land Ordinance of 1785? How did the ordinance arrange for future states to enter the Union?

WWN64
Figure M6_1 First proof 31p0 x 31p6 
 boundaries of the thirteen original states became public domain, owned and administered by the national government. Between 1784 and 1787, the Confederation Congress created three major ordinances (policies) detailing how the ­government-​­owned lands in the West would be surveyed, sold, and developed. These ordinances rank among the

 250  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 Confederation’s greatest ­achievements—​­and among the most important in American history. Thomas Jefferson drafted the Land Ordinance Act of 1784, which urged states to drop their competing claims to ­Indian-​­held territory west of the Appalachian Mountains so that the vast, unmapped area could be divided into as many as fourteen ­self-​­governing territories of equal size. In the new territories, all adult white males would be eligible to vote, hold office, and write constitutions for their territorial governments. When a territory’s population equaled that of the smallest existing state (Rhode Island), it would be eligible for statehood. Before Jefferson’s plan could take effect, however, the Confederation Congress revised it through the Land Ordinance of 1785, which outlined a plan of land surveys and sales for the Northwest Territory (the area that would become the states of Ohio, Michigan, Indiana, Illinois, and Wisconsin), and later on, the Great Plains. Wherever Indian lands were p ­ urchased—​­or ­taken—​ ­they were surveyed and divided into ­six-​­mile-​­square townships laid out along a grid of lines running ­east–​­west and ­north–​­south. Each township was in turn divided into t­ hirty-​­six sections one mile square (640 acres), with each section divided into four farms. The 640-acre sections of “public lands” were to be sold at auctions, the proceeds of which went into the national treasury.

 the northwest ordinance

 The third major land policy created by the Confederation Congress was the Northwest Ordinance of 1787. It set forth two key principles: the new western territories would eventually become states, and slavery was banned from the region north of the Ohio River (slaves already there would remain slaves, however). The Northwest Ordinance also included a promise, which would be repeatedly broken, that Indian lands “shall never be taken from them without their consent.” For a new territory to become a state, the Northwest Ordinance specified a ­three-​­stage process. First, Congress would appoint a territorial governor and other officials to create a legal code and administer justice. Second, when the population of adult males reached 5,000, they could elect a territorial legislature. Third, when a territory’s population reached 60,000 “free inhabitants,” it could draft a constitution and apply to Congress for statehood.

 diplomacy

 After the Revolutionary War, relations with Great Britain and Spain remained tense because both nations kept trading posts, forts, and soldiers on American soil, and both nations encouraged Indians to resist American efforts to settle on their tribal lands. The British refused to remove their troops south of the Canadian border in protest of the failure of Amer-

The Confederation Government  251


THE OLD NORTHWEST, 1785
British posts after 1783 Present-day state boundaries CANADA (British) 
 r

Ri
 ve

 e Su pe r i o

 ce

Lak


La


Fort Michilimackinac


La


St


 an

Hur
 on

 TH

Lake Michig


.


Oswegatchie


 ke

NOR WE

Lak


 r e Onta

Fort Niagara
Detroit
La


 ST

 ke

Eri


 io

 Dutchman’s Point

Pointeau-Fer


Oswego


NEW YORK

 e

 PENNSYLVANIA

R


 IT

Delaware
River


 OR

Y


Cincinnati


 NJ

Pittsburgh
 ma c

E


R


Ri


Po
 to

T


 LOUISIANA (Spanish)

 n re w

 MD ve

 r

 DE

 VIRGINIA







200 Miles


 r

O hio R


 r ive

200 Kilometers


 How did the Northwest Ordinance of 1787 revise Jefferson’s earlier plan for territorial government? WWN64 Figure M6_2 ■ How were settlement patterns in the Northwest territories different from Firstthose proof on the frontier in the South? 31p0 x 25p0 ■ How did the United States treat Native American claims to their ancestral lands in the West? ■

 icans to pay their prewar debts to British merchants. Another major irritant in U.S.-British relations was the seizure of Loyalist property. During and after the war, Americans had confiscated Tory homes, businesses, farms, and slaves. With Spain, the chief issues were the southern boundary of the United States and the right for Americans to send boats or barges down the Mississippi River, which Spain then controlled. After the Seven Years’ War in 1763, Spain had acquired the vast Louisiana Territory, which included the valuable port of New Orleans, the Mississippi River, and all of the area west to the Rocky Mountains. After the Revolution, Spain closed the Mississippi River to A ­ merican use,

 252  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 infuriating settlers in Kentucky and Tennessee. Spain also regained ownership of Florida, which then included southern Alabama. Thereafter, the Spanish governor in Florida provided firearms to Creek Indians, who resisted American encroachment on their lands in south Georgia.

 trade and the economy

 More troublesome than the behavior of the British and the Spanish was the fragile state of the American economy. Seven years of warfare had nearly bankrupted the new nation. The escape of some 60,000 slaves during and after the Revolution was a terrible blow to the southern economy. At the same time, many men who had served in the army had never been paid. Civilians who had loaned money, supplies, crops, and livestock to the war effort had also not been repaid. After the war, the British treated the United States as an enemy nation, insisting that all Americans who had been born in England were still bound by allegiance to King George III. British warships began stopping American ships in the Atlantic, boarding them, and kidnapping ­English-​­born American sailors and “impressing” them into service in the Royal Navy. The British also closed their profitable island colonies in the Caribbean to American commerce. New England shipowners and southern planters were especially ­hard-​­hit, as exports of tobacco, rice, rum, and other commodities remained far below what they had been before the war. After 1783, merchant ships were allowed to deliver American products to England and return to the United States with English goods. But U.S. vessels could not carry British goods anywhere else in the world. To punish Britain for banning U.S. trade with the British West Indies, many state governments imposed special taxes (called tonnage fees) on British vessels arriving in American ports and levied tariffs (taxes) on British goods brought to the United States. The British responded by sending their ships to ports in states whose tariff rates were lower. Domestic industry American By charging different tariffs on the craftsmen, such as this cabinetmaker, same products, the states waged comfavored tariffs on foreign goods that mercial war with each other. The result competed with their own products. was economic chaos. By 1787, it was

The “Gathering Crisis”  253


 evident that the national government needed to regulate interstate trade and foreign relations, especially in regard to British and Spanish control of enormous territories bordering the United States.

 scarce money Complex financial issues also hampered economic development during the Critical Period. There was no stable national currency, and the nation had only three ­banks—​­in Philadelphia, New York City, and ­Boston—​­all created since 1782. Farmers who had profited during the war now found themselves squeezed by lower crop prices and mounting debts and taxes. The widespread shortage of “hard money” (gold and silver coins), which had gone to European merchants to buy imported goods, led people to postpone paying their bills. By 1785, indebted citizens urged states to print new paper currency. In a drama that would be replayed many times over the next century, debtors believed that printing paper money would ease their plight by increasing the money supply (inflation). In 1785–1786, seven states began issuing their own paper money to help indebted farmers and to pay the cash bonuses promised to military veterans.

The “Gathering Crisis”
 The economic difficulties weakening the Confederation were compounded by growing fears among wealthy “gentlemen” leaders (“natural aristocrats”) that the democratic energies unleashed by the Revolution (“all men are born equal”) were undermining the authority of the traditional social and economic elite. Class distinctions were disappearing as many among the working poor and “middling classes” stopped deferring to their “betters.” The ­so-​­called better sort of people were appalled at the “leveling” behavior of the “antifederal peasants,” “little folks,” and “demagogues” who were challenging their leadership. A Virginia aristocrat grumbled that the “spirit of independency” that inspired the Revolution was being “converted into equality” after the war. The political culture was also changing; more men could now vote and hold office as ­property-​­owning qualifications were reduced or eliminated in several states. The nation, said wealthy New Yorker John Jay, was headed toward “Evils and Calamities” because the masses were gaining power and often taking the laws into their own hands. No sooner was the war over than Americans with large debts again began to protest taxes. To begin paying down their war debts, most state legislatures

 254  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 had sharply increased taxes. In fact, during the 1780s, most Americans paid three times as much in taxes as they had under British “tyranny.” Earlier, they had objected to taxation without representation; now, they objected to taxation with representation. Some Patriots lost farms because of their inability to pay the new taxes; other debtors were imprisoned. In New Hampshire, in what was called the Exeter Riot, ­ hard-​­ pressed farmers surrounded the legislative building, demanding that the representatives print paper money to ease their plight. Similar appeals occurred in other states. The economic and political elites were horrified that the “new men” were endangering the “security of property” by encouraging the printing of more money.

 shays’s rebellion

 Fears of a taxpayer “revolt from below” became all too real in western Massachusetts, when struggling farmers, many of them former soldiers, demanded that the state issue more paper money and give them more time to pay the “unjust” taxes owed on their land. Farmers also resented the new state constitution because it raised the property qualifications for voting and holding elected office, thus stripping poorer men of political power. When the ­ merchant-​­ dominated Massachusetts legislature refused to provide relief, however, three rural counties in the western part of the state erupted in a disorganized revolt in 1786. One rebel farmer, Plough Jogger, expressed the fears of many when he charged that the “great men are going to get all we have, and I think it is time for us to rise and put a stop to it, and have no more courts, nor sheriffs, nor [tax] collectors, nor lawyers.” Armed groups of angry farmers, called Regulators, banded together to force judges and sheriffs to stop seizing the cattle and farms of those who could not pay their taxes. “Close down the courts,” they shouted. A prominent Bostonian reported that Massachusetts was “in a state of Anarchy and Confusion bordering on Civil War.” The situation worsened when a Shays’s Rebellion Shays and his followers demanded that states ragtag “army” of unruly farmers led issue paper currency to help ease by t­ hirty-​­nine-​­year-​­old Daniel Shays, the payment of debts and the right to a war veteran, marched on the federal postpone paying taxes until the postwar arsenal at Springfield in the winter of agricultural depression lifted. 1787. The state government responded

Creating the Constitution  255


 by sending 4,400 militiamen who scattered Shays’s debtor army with a single cannon blast that left four farmers dead and many wounded. Shays fled to Vermont. Several others were arrested, and two were hanged. The rebels nevertheless earned a victory of sorts, as the state legislature agreed to eliminate some of the taxes and fees on farmers. News of Shays’s Rebellion sent shock waves across the nation. In Massachusetts, Abigail Adams, the wife of future president John Adams, dismissed Shays and his followers as “ignorant, restless, desperadoes, without conscience or principles.” In Virginia, George Washington was equally concerned. America, he exclaimed, needed a “government by which our lives, liberty, and properties will be secured.” Unless an alternative could be found to the weak Confederation government, “anarchy and confusion will inevitably ensue.”

Creating the Constitution
 In the wake of Shays’s Rebellion, a collective shiver passed through what wealthy New Yorker John Jay called “the better kind of people.” Many among the “rich and ­well-​­born” agreed with George Washington that the nation was “tottering.” The time had come to empower the national government to bring social order and economic stability.

 the “crisis is arrived”

 During the 1780s, newspapers warned that the nation’s situation had grown “critical and dangerous” and that its “vices” were threatening “national ruin.” The states were behaving like thirteen ungovernable nations, pursuing their own trade regulations and foreign policies (nine of them claimed to have their own navies). “Our present federal government,” said Henry Knox, a Boston bookseller who was a general during the Revolutionary War, “is a name, a shadow, without power, or effect.” Such concerns led political leaders to revise their assessment of the American republic. “We have, probably,” concluded Washington in 1786, “had too good an opinion of human nature in forming our confederation.” Fellow Virginian James Madison agreed, declaring in 1787 that the “crisis is arrived.” It was time to create a new federal constitution that would repair the “vices of the political system” and “decide forever the fate of republican government.” New Yorker Alexander Hamilton urged that a national gathering of delegates from each state be given “full powers” to revise the Articles of Confederation.

 the constitutional convention

 In 1787, the Confederation Congress responded to Hamilton and others by calling for a special

 256  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 “federal” convention to gather in Philadelphia’s Old State House (now known as Independence Hall) for the “purpose of revising the Articles of Confederation.” Only Rhode Island refused to participate. The delegates began work on May 25, 1787, meeting five hours a day, six days a week. After four months of secret deliberations, t­hirty-​­nine delegates signed the new federal constitution on September 17. Only three delegates refused to sign. The durability of the Constitution reflects the thoughtful men who created it. The delegates were all white; their average age was f­orty-​­two, with the youngest being t­wenty-​­six. Most were members of the political and economic elite. ­Twenty-​­six were college graduates; two were college presidents, and ­thirty-​­four were lawyers. Others were planters, merchants, bankers, and clergymen. Yet the “Founding Fathers” were also practical men of experience, tested in the fires of the Revolutionary War. T ­ wenty-​­two had fought in the war, five of whom were captured and imprisoned by the British. Seven had been state governors, and eight had helped write their state constitutions. Most had been members of the Continental or Confederation Congresses, and eight had signed the Declaration of Independence. Nearly all were considered “gentlemen,” and more than half of them owned slaves.

 Drafting the Constitution George Washington presides over a session of the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia.

Creating the Constitution  257


 drafting the constitution

 The widely ­respected—​­even r­ evered—​­George Washington served as presiding officer at the Federal Convention (later renamed the Constitutional Convention). He participated little in the debates, however, for fear that people would take his prestigious opinions too seriously. The governor of Pennsylvania, ­eighty-​­one-​­year-​­old ­Benjamin Franklin, the oldest delegate, was in such poor health that he had to be carried to the meetings in a special chair, borne aloft by inmates from the Philadelphia jail. Like Washington, Franklin said little from the floor but provided a wealth of experience, wit, and common sense behind the scenes. Most active at the Convention was James Madison of Virginia, the ablest political theorist in the group. A ­thirty-​­six-​­year-​­old attorney who owned a huge tobacco plantation called Montpelier, not far from Jefferson’s Monticello, Madison had arrived in Philadelphia with trunks full of books about governments and a head full of ideas about how best to strengthen the loose confederation of “independent and sovereign states.” Madison was an unlikely giant at ­constitution-​­making. Barely five feet tall and weighing only 120 pounds (a colleague said he was “no bigger than half a piece of soap”), he was too frail to serve in the Revolutionary army and suffered from occasional epileptic seizures. “He speaks low, his person [body] is little and ordinary,” and he was “too timid in his politics,” remarked crusty Fisher Ames of Massachusetts. Although painfully shy and s­oft-​ ­spoken, Madison had an agile mind, a huge appetite for learning, and a lifelong commitment to public service. He was determined to create a constitution that would ensure the “supremacy of national authority.” The logic of his ­arguments—​­and his pragmatic willingness to compromise on particular ­points—​­proved decisive in shaping the new constitution. “Every person seems to acknowledge his greatness,” said a Georgia delegate. Most delegates agreed with Madison James Madison This 1783 miniature that their young republic needed a stron- shows Madison at t­ hirty-​­two years old, ger national government, weaker state just four years before he would assume a major role in drafting the Constitution. legislatures, and the power to restrain the

 258  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 “excessive” democratic impulses unleashed by the Revolution. “The evils we experience,” said Elbridge Gerry of Massachusetts, “flow from the excess of democracy.” Two interrelated assumptions guided the Constitutional Convention: that the national government must have direct authority over the citizenry rather than governing through the state governments, and that the national government must derive its legitimacy from the people rather than from the state legislatures. The insistence on the sovereignty of “the people,” that the voters were “the legitimate source of all authority,” as James Wilson of Pennsylvania stressed, was the most important political innovation since the Declaration of Independence. By declaring the Constitution to be the voice of “the people,” the founders authorized the federal government to limit the powers of the state governments. The delegates realized, too, that an effective national government needed new authority to collect taxes, borrow and issue money, regulate commerce, fund an army and navy, and make laws binding upon individual citizens. This meant that the states must be stripped of the power to print paper money, make treaties, wage war, and levy tariffs on imported goods. This concept of dividing authority between the national government and the states came to be called federalism.

 the virginia and new jersey plans James Madison drafted the framework for the initial discussions at the Constitutional Convention. His proposals, called the Virginia Plan, started with a radical suggestion: that the delegates scrap their original instructions to revise the Articles of Confederation and instead create an entirely new constitution. The Virginia Plan called for a “national government [with] a supreme legislative, executive, and judiciary.” It proposed a new Congress divided into two houses (bicameral): a lower House of Representatives chosen by the voters and an upper house of senators elected by the state legislatures. The ­more-​ ­populous states would have more representatives in Congress than the smaller states. Madison also wanted to give Congress the power to veto state laws. The Virginia Plan sparked furious disagreements. When asked why the small states were so suspicious of the plan, Gunning Bedford of Delaware replied: “I do not, gentlemen, trust you.” On June 15, Bedford and other delegates submitted an alternative called the New Jersey Plan, developed by William Paterson of New Jersey. It sought to keep the existing equal representation of the states in a unicameral (­one-​ ­house) national legislature. It also gave Congress the power to collect taxes

Creating the Constitution  259


 and regulate commerce and the authority to name a chief executive as well as a supreme court, but not the right to veto state laws.

The Three Branches of Government
 The intense debate over congressional representation was finally resolved in ­mid-​­July by the ­so-​­called Great Compromise, which used elements of both plans. The more populous states won apportionment (the allocation of delegates to each state) by population in the proposed House of Representatives, while the delegates who sought to protect state power won equality of state representation in the Senate, where each state would have two members, elected by the legislatures rather than directly by the people.

 the legislature

 The Great Compromise embedded the innovative concept of separation of powers in the new Congress. It would have two separate houses, each intended to counterbalance the other, with the House of Representatives representing the voters at large and the Senate representing the state legislatures. The “lower” house, the House of Representatives, was designed to be, as George Mason said, “the grand repository of the democratic principle of the Government.” Its members would be elected by the voters every two years. (Under the Articles of Confederation, none of the members of Congress had been chosen by popular vote; all of them had been elected by state legislatures.) James Madison argued that allowing individual citizens to elect one part of the new legislature was “essential to every plan of free government.” The upper house, or Senate, was intended to be a more elite group, its members elected by state legislatures for ­six-​­year terms. The Senate was intended to be a conservative balancing force. It could use its power to overrule the House of Representatives or the president. Madison explained that the Senate would help “protect the minority of the opulent against the majority.”

 the presidency The Constitutional Convention struggled mightily over issues related to the executive branch. Some delegates wanted a powerful president who could veto acts of Congress. Others felt the opposite: that the president should simply “execute” the laws as passed by Congress. Still others, like Benjamin Franklin, wanted a “plural executive” rather than a single man governing the nation. The eventual decision to have a single chief executive caused many delegates “considerable pause,” according to James Madison. George Mason of Virginia feared that a single president might start behaving like a king.

 260  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 In the end, several compromises ensured that the president would be powerful enough to counterbalance the Congress. In some cases, the chief executive’s powers actually exceeded those of the British king. The new president, to be elected for ­four-​­year terms, could veto acts of Congress, subject to being overridden by a ­two-​­thirds vote in each house; in Britain, the royal veto over parliamentary legislation had long since been abandoned. The president was to be the nation’s chief diplomat and commander in chief of the armed forces, and was responsible for implementing the laws made by Congress. Yet the powers of the president were also limited in key areas. The chief executive could neither declare war nor make peace; those powers were reserved for Congress. Unlike the British monarch, moreover, the president could be removed from office. The House of Representatives could impeach (bring to trial) the chief ­executive—​­and other civil ­officers—​­on charges of treason, bribery, or “other high crimes and misdemeanors.” An impeached president could be removed from office if t­wo-​­thirds of the Senate voted for conviction. To preserve the separation of the three branches of the new national government, the president would be elected not by Congress, but by a group of highly qualified “electors” chosen by “the people” in local elections. The number of electors for each state would depend upon the combined number of

 Signing the Constitution, September 17, 1787 Thomas Pritchard Rossiter’s painting shows George Washington presiding over what Thomas Jefferson called “an assembly of ­demi-​­gods” in Philadelphia.

Creating the Constitution  261


 Congressional representatives and U.S. senators. This “Electoral College” was a compromise between those wanting the president elected by Congress and those preferring a direct vote of qualified citizens.

 the judiciary

 The third proposed branch of government, the judiciary, sparked little debate. The Constitution called for a supreme national court headed by a chief justice. The Supreme Court’s role was not to make laws (a power reserved to Congress) or to execute and enforce the laws (reserved to the presidency), but to interpret the laws and to ensure that every citizen received equal justice under the law. The U.S. Supreme Court was given final authority in interpreting the Constitution and in settling constitutional disputes between states. Furthermore, Article VI of the Constitution declared that the federal Constitution, federal laws, and treaties are “the supreme Law of the Land,” state laws or constitutions “to the Contrary notwithstanding.”

The Limits of the Constitution
 The men who drafted the new constitution claimed to be representing all Americans. To highlight that point, the Constitution begins with the words: “We the people of the United States, in order to form a more perfect Union . . . ​ establish this Constitution for the United States of America.” In fact, however, as Senator Stephen Douglas of Illinois noted seventy years later, the Constitution was “made by white men, for the benefit of white men and their posterity [descendants] forever.” Important groups of Americans were left out of the Constitution’s protections. Native Americans, for example, were not considered federal or state citizens unless they paid taxes, which very few did. The Constitution declared that Native American “tribes” were not part of the United States but instead were separate “nations.”

 slavery

 Of all the issues that emerged during the Constitutional Convention of 1787, none was more explosive than slavery. When the Patriots declared independence in 1776, slavery existed in every state. By 1787, however, Massachusetts, Pennsylvania, Connecticut, and Rhode Island had abolished the practice. Many of the framers viewed slavery as an embarrassing contradiction to the principles of liberty and equality embodied in the Declaration of Independence and the new Constitution. A New Jersey delegate declared that slavery

 262  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 was “utterly inconsistent with the principles of Christianity and humanity.” By contrast, most delegates from the southern states stoutly defended slavery. “Religion and humanity [have] nothing to do with this [slavery] question,” declared John Rutledge of South Carolina. “Interest alone is the governing principle of nations.” Most southern delegates would have walked out had there been an attempt to abolish slavery. So the framers did not consider ending the cursed system, nor did they view the enslaved as human beings whose rights should be protected. Slaves were simply viewed as a form of property with a cash value. Those with qualms about slavery salved their consciences by assuming that the practice would eventually die out naturally. If the slaves were not to be freed or their rights to be acknowledged, however, how were they to be counted? Since the size of state delegations in the proposed House of Representatives was to be based on population, southern delegates argued that slaves should be counted to help determine how many representatives from each state would serve in the new Congress. Northerners countered that it made no sense to count slaves for purposes of congressional representation when they were treated as property rather than people. The delegates finally agreed to a compromise in which t­ hree-​­fifths of “all other persons” (that is, the enslaved) would be included in population counts as a basis for apportioning a state’s congressional representatives. In a constitution intended to “secure the blessings of liberty to ourselves and our posterity,” the ­three-​­fifths clause was a glaring example of compromise being divorced from principle. The corrupt bargain over slavery would bedevil the nation for the next ­seventy-​­five years. By design, the original Constitution never mentions the word slavery. Instead, it speaks of “free persons” and “all other persons,” and of persons Charles Calvert and His Slave (1761) In military regalia, the ­five-​­year-​ “held to service of labor.” The word ­old descendant of Lord Baltimore, slavery would not appear in the Confounder of Maryland, towers over his stitution until the Thirteenth Amendslave, who is dressed as a drummer boy. ment (1865) abolished it.

Creating the Constitution  263


 The ­three-​­fifths clause gave the southern states disproportionate power in Congress by increasing the number of southern votes in the House of Representatives. This, in turn, increased southern influence in the Electoral College, since the number of each state’s electors was to be the total of its senators and representatives. It was thus no accident that in the nation’s first sixteen presidential elections, between 1788 and 1848, a southern slaveholder would be elected twelve times. The p ­ ro-​­slavery nature of the Constitution prompted the fiery ­abolitionist William Lloyd Garrison to declare in the 1830s that the framers of the document had forged a “covenant with death and an agreement with hell.”

 the absence of women

 The delegates at the Constitutional Convention dismissed any discussion of political rights for women. Yet not all women were willing to maintain their traditional subordinate role. Just as the experiences of the Revolutionary War led many African Americans to seize their freedom, some brave women demanded political equality for themselves. Eliza Yonge Wilkinson, born in 1757 to a wealthy plantation family living on an island south of Charleston, South Carolina, lost her husband early in the war. In June 1780, after Wilkinson was assaulted and robbed by “inhuman” British soldiers, she became a fiery Patriot who “hated Tyranny in every shape.” She assured a friend that “We may be led, but we never will be driven!” Likewise, Wilkinson expected greater freedom for women after the war. “The men say we have no business [with politics],” she wrote to a friend. “I won’t have it thought that because we are the weaker sex as to bodily strength, my dear, we are capable of nothing more than minding the dairy, visiting the ­poultry-​­house, and all such domestic concerns.” Wilkinson demanded more. “They won’t even allow us the liberty of thought, and that is all I want.” Judith Sargent Murray, a Massachusetts essayist, playwright, and poet, argued that the rights and liberties fought for by Patriots belonged not just to men but to women, too. In her essay “On the Equality of the Sexes,” published in 1790, she challenged the prevailing view that men had greater intellectual capacities than women. She insisted that any differences resulted from prejudice and discrimination that prevented women from having access to formal education and worldly experience. The arguments for gender equality, however, fell mostly on deaf ears. At the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia, there was no formal discussion of women’s rights, nor does the Constitution even include the word women. Writing from Paris, Thomas Jefferson expressed the hope that American “ladies” would be “contented to soothe and calm the minds of their husbands returning ruffled from political debate.”

 264  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 immigration

 Although America was a nation of immigrants, the Constitution said little about immigration and naturalization (the process of gaining citizenship), and most of what it said was negative. In Article II, Section 1, it prohibits any future immigrant from becoming president, limiting the office to a “born Citizen.” On defining citizenship, the Constitution gives Congress the authority “to establish a uniform Rule of Naturalization” but offers no further guidance. As a result, naturalization policy has changed repeatedly over the years in response to fluctuating social attitudes, economic needs, and political moods. In 1790, the first Congress under the new constitution would pass a naturalization law that allowed “free white persons” who had been in the United States for as few as two years to be made naturalized citizens. This meant that persons of African descent were denied citizenship; it was left to individual states to determine whether free blacks were citizens. Because Indians were not “free white persons,” they were also treated as aliens. Not until 1924 would Native Americans be granted c­ itizenship—​­by an act of Congress rather than a constitutional amendment. On September 17, 1787, the Federal Convention reported that it had completed the new constitution. “Gentlemen,” announced Benjamin Franklin, “you have a republic, if you can keep it.”

The Fight for Ratification
 The final draft of the Constitution was submitted to thirteen special state conventions for approval (ratification) on September 28, 1787. Over the next ten months, people from all walks of life, in taverns and coffeehouses, on street corners, around dinner tables, and in the nation’s n ­ inety-​­two newspapers, debated the new constitution’s merits. As Alexander Hamilton noted, the debate would reveal whether the people could establish good government “by reflection and choice” rather than by “accident and force.” The outcome was by no means certain, but Hamilton said that during the f­our-​­month Constitutional Convention, “there has been an astonishing revolution for the better in the minds of the people” about the new frame of government.

 choosing sides Advocates for the Constitution assumed the name Federalists; opponents became ­anti-​­Federalists. The two sides formed the seeds for America’s first ­two-​­party political system. In the prolonged debate, the Federalists, led by James Madison and Alexander Hamilton, had several advantages. First, they had a concrete proposal, the proposed constitution itself; their opponents had nothing to offer instead but ­criticism. Second, the Federalist leaders were, on average, ten to twelve

The Fight for Ratification  265


 years younger and more energetic than the ­anti-​­Federalists; many of them had been members of the Constitutional Convention and were familiar with the disputed issues in the document. Third, the Federalists were more unified and better organized. The ­anti-​­Federalist ­leaders—​­Virginians Patrick Henry, George Mason, Richard Henry Lee, and future president James Monroe; George Clinton of New York; Samuel Adams, Elbridge Gerry, and Mercy Otis Warren of Massachusetts; Luther Martin and Samuel Chase of M ­ aryland—​­were a diverse group. Some wanted to reject the Constitution and retain the Confederation. Others wanted to convene another convention and start over. Still others wanted to revise the proposed constitution. Most ­anti-​­Federalists worried that the new national government would eventually grow corrupt and tyrannical. Mercy Otis Warren of Massachusetts, the most prominent woman then writing regular political commentary, compared the constitution to “shackles on our own necks.” A Philadelphia writer denounced those who drafted the Constitution as representing “the Aristocratic Party” intent upon creating a “monarchical” national government. The ­anti-​­Federalists especially criticized the absence of a “bill of rights” in the proposed constitution to protect individuals and states from the growing power of the national government. Other than the bill of rights, however, the ­anti-​­Federalists had no comprehensive alternative to the Constitution except the admittedly flawed Articles of Confederation.

 the federalist

Among the
 supreme legacies of the long debate over the Constitution is what came to be called The Federalist Papers, a collection of ­eighty-​­five essays published in New York newspapers between 1787 and 1788. Written by James Madison, Alexander Hamilton, and John Jay, the essays defended the concept of a strong national government and outlined the major principles and assumptions

The Federalist Papers Alexander
Hamilton, James Madison, and John
 Jay published this series of essays in 1788 defending the concept of stronger central government and urging ratification of the Constitution.

 266  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 embodied in the Constitution. Thomas Jefferson called The Federalist Papers the “best commentary on the principles of government which ever was written.” In the most famous of the Federalist essays, Number 10, Madison turned the conventional wisdom about republics on its head. From ancient times, it had been assumed that ­self-​­governing republics survived only if they were small and homogeneous. Patrick Henry, in fact, argued that a single national government “could not reign over so extensive a country as this is, without absolute despotism.” Madison, however, argued that small republics usually fell victim to warring f­ actions—​­well-​­organized interest groups pursuing their ­self-​­interest at the expense of the whole. In the United States, he explained, the size and diversity of the expanding nation would make it impossible for any single faction to form a dangerous majority that could dominate the federal ­government—​­or society at large. The contending factions would, in essence, cancel each other out. In addition, he argued that it was the responsibility of the Congress to regulate “these various and interfering interests.” Madison and the other framers created a legal and political system designed to protect minorities from a tyranny of the majority. Given a new federal government in which power was checked and balanced among the three federal branches, a large republic could work better than a small one to prevent factional tyranny. “Extend the [geographic] sphere,” Madison wrote, “and you take in a greater variety of parties and interests; you make it less probable that a majority of the whole will have a common motive to invade the rights of other citizens.”

 the states decide

 Several of the smaller s­tates—​­Delaware, New Jersey, and ­Georgia—​­were among the first to ratify the Constitution. Massachusetts, still sharply divided in the aftermath of Shays’s Rebellion, was the first state in which the outcome was close, approving the Constitution by 187 to 168 on February 6, 1788. On June 21, 1788, New Hampshire became the ninth state to ratify the Constitution, thereby reaching the minimum number of states needed for approval. The Constitution, however, could hardly succeed without the approval of Virginia, the largest, wealthiest, and most populous state, or New York, which had the ­third-​­highest population and occupied a key position geographically. Both states included strong opposition groups who were eventually won over by the same pledge as had been made in ­Massachusetts—​­the addition of a bill of rights. Upon notification that New Hampshire had become the ninth state to ratify the Constitution, the Confederation Congress chose New York City as the initial national capital and called for the new national government to assume power in 1789. The Constitution was adopted, but the spirited resistance to it

The Fight for Ratification  267


THE VOTE ON THE CONSTITUTION, 1787–1790
Federalist majority Anti-Federalist majority Evenly divided MAINE (to Mass.) 
Lake Michi
 gan

Lake
Huron


 NH

 ntario Lake O

 e Lak

NEW YORK

 e Eri

MA CT RI

PENNSYLVANIA NJ MD

 DE

VIRGINIA KENTUCKY DISTRICT TENNESSEE DISTRICT

ATLANTIC OCEAN

NORTH CAROLINA

SOUTH CAROLINA GEORGIA



200 Miles


200 Kilometers


 Who were the leading Federalists and ­anti-​­Federalists? Why were the ­anti-​­Federalists opposed to the Constitution? WWN64 ■ How did the Federalists win the national vote ratifying the Constitution? ■ ■

Figure M6_3
 frst proof 23p0 x 32p0

 268  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 convinced the new Congress to propose the first ten constitutional amendments now known as the Bill of Rights. After attending a parade celebrating the ratification of the Constitution, Dr. Benjamin Rush, a Philadelphia physician, noted with satisfaction that “It is done. We have become a nation.” Other celebrants shared the hope that the new frame of government would last. “Our Constitution is in actual operation,” Benjamin Franklin wrote to a friend in 1789. “Everything appears to promise that it will last; but in this world nothing is certain but death and taxes.” George Washington was even more uncertain about the future, predicting that the Constitution would not “last for more than twenty years.” The Constitution has lasted much longer, of course, and in the process its adaptability has provided a model of resilient republican government. The Constitution was by no means perfect (after all, it has been amended ­twenty-​ ­seven times); it was a bundle of messy compromises and concessions that left many issues, the most important of which was slavery, undecided or ignored. Few of the Constitution’s supporters liked it in its entirety, but most believed that it was the best frame of government obtainable and that it would continue to evolve and improve over time. The Constitution confirmed that the United States would be the first democratic republic in history. The founders believed that they were creating a unique political system based on a “new science of politics” combining the best aspects of democracies and republics. In a democracy, the people rule;

 Sixth pillar An engraving published in 1788 in The Massachusetts Centinel after Massachusetts became the sixth state to ratify the Constitution. By the end of 1788, five more states would approve, and the new Constitution would soon go into effect. The last two states to ratify were North Carolina in 1789 and Rhode Island in 1790.

The Federalist Era  269


Ratification of the Constitution
ORDER OF R
­ ATIFICATION 
 STATE

DATE OF RATIFICATION



Delaware


December 7, 1787




Pennsylvania


December 12, 1787




New Jersey


December 18, 1787




Georgia


January 2, 1788




Connecticut


January 9, 1788




Massachusetts


February 6, 1788




Maryland


April 28, 1788




South Carolina


May 23, 1788




New Hampshire


June 21, 1788




Virginia


June 25, 1788




New York


July 26, 1788




North Carolina


November 21, 1789




Rhode Island


May 29, 1790


 in a republic, the officials elected by the people rule. At the Constitutional Convention, the delegates combined aspects of both approaches so that they balanced and regulated each other, and ensured that personal freedoms and the public welfare were both protected in the process.

The Federalist Era
 The Constitution was ratified because it promised to create a more powerful national government better capable of managing a rapidly growing republic. Yet it was one thing to ratify a new constitution and quite another to make the new government run smoothly. With each passing year, the United States witnessed growing debate over how to interpret and apply the provisions of the new constitution. During the 1790s, a decade called the “age of passion,” the federal government would confront rebellions, states threatening to secede, international tensions, and foreign wars, as well as something left unmentioned in the Constitution: the formation of fiercely competing political parties—Federalists and Democratic Republicans, more commonly known as Jeffersonian Republicans, or simply as Republicans. The two political parties came to represent very different visions for America. The Democratic Republicans were mostly southerners, like Virginians Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, who wanted the country to remain a

 270  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 New beginnings An engraving from the title page of The Universal Asylum and Columbian Magazine (published in Philadelphia in 1790). America is represented as a woman laying down her shield to engage in education, art, commerce, and agriculture.

 rural nation of small farmers dedicated to republican values. The ­Democratic Republicans distrusted the national government, defended states’ rights, ­preferred a “strict” interpretation of the Constitution, and placed their trust in the masses. “The will of the majority, the natural law of every society,” Jefferson insisted, “is the only sure guardian of the rights of men.” The Federalists, led by Alexander Hamilton and John Adams, were clustered in New York and New England and embraced urban culture, industrial development, and commercial growth. Federalists distrusted the “passions” of the common people and advocated a strong national government and a flexible interpretation of the Constitution. As Hamilton stressed, “the people are turbulent and changing; they seldom judge or determine right.”

 the first president On March 4, 1789, the new Congress convened in New York City. A few weeks later, the presiding officer of the Senate certified that George Washington, with 69 Electoral College votes, was the nation’s first president. John Adams of Massachusetts, with 34 votes, the ­second-​­highest number, became vice president (At this time, no candidates ran specifically for the vice presidency; the presidential candidate who came in second, regardless of party affiliation, became vice president).

The Federalist Era  271


 George Washington was a reluctant first president. He would have preferred to stay at Mount Vernon, his Virginia plantation, but agreed to serve because he had been “summoned by my country.” Some complained that Washington’s personality was too cold and aloof. Others thought he was unsophisticated, since he had little formal education and had never visited Europe. The acidic John Adams groused that Washington was “too illiterate, unlearned, [and] unread” to be president. Washington had virtues that Adams lacked, however. As a French diplomat observed, President Washington had “the soul, look, and figure of a hero in action.” He was a soldier who had married a wealthy young widow and become a prosperous tobacco planter and land speculator. He brought to the presidency both a detached dignity and a remarkable capacity for leadership that helped keep the young republic from disintegrating. Although capable of angry outbursts, Washington was honest, honorable, and remarkably ­self-​­disciplined; he had extraordinary stamina and patience, integrity and resolve, courage and resilience. And he exercised sound judgment. He usually asked people for their views, weighed his options, and made a decision. Most of all, he was fearless. Few doubted that he was the best person to lead the new nation. In his inaugural address, Washington appealed for unity, pleading with the new Congress to abandon “local prejudices” and “party animosities” to create the “national” outlook necessary for the fledgling republic to thrive. Within a few months, he would see his hopes dashed. Personal rivalries, sectional tensions, and political infighting would dominate life in the 1790s.

 washington’s cabinet America’s first president took charge of a tiny national government that faced massive challenges. George Washington had a larger staff at his Mount Vernon plantation than he did as president of the United States. Unlike today, when the executive branch has hundreds of staff members, President Washington had two. And when those two secretaries went on vacation, he was forced to write all presidential letters himself. In addition, when the president’s office needed new furniture, he paid for it. During the summer of 1789, Congress created executive departments corresponding to those formed under the Confederation. To head the Department of State, President Washington named Thomas Jefferson, recently back from his diplomatic duties in France. To lead the Department of the Treasury, Washington appointed Alexander Hamilton, who was widely read in matters of government finance. Washington selected John Jay as the first chief justice of the Supreme Court. After serving as president of the Continental Congress in 1778–1779, Jay became the American minister (ambassador) to Spain. While in Europe, he helped John Adams and Benjamin Franklin negotiate the Treaty of Paris

 272  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 in 1783. After the Revolution, Jay served as secretary of foreign affairs. He joined Hamilton and James Madison as ­co-​­author of The Federalist Papers and became one of the most effective champions of the Constitution. President Washington routinely called his chief staff members together to discuss matters of policy. This was the origin of the president’s cabinet, an advisory body for which the Constitution made no formal provision. The office of vice president also took on what would become its typical character. “The ­Vice-​­Presidency,” John Adams wrote his wife, Abigail, is the most “insignificant office . . . ​ever . . . ​contrived.”

 the bill of rights

 To address concerns raised by opponents of the new federal government, James Madison, now a congressman from Virginia, presented to Congress in May 1789 a set of constitutional amendments intended to protect individual rights from excessive government power. As Thomas Jefferson explained, such a “bill of rights is what the people are entitled to against every government on earth, general or particular, and what no just government should refuse.” After considerable debate, Congress approved twelve amendments in September 1789. By the end of 1791, the necessary ­three-​­fourths of the states had approved ten of the twelve proposed amendments, now known as the Bill of Rights. The Bill of Rights provided safeguards for individual rights of speech, assembly, and the press; the right to own firearms; the right to refuse to house soldiers; protection against unreasonable searches and seizures; the right to refuse to testify against oneself; the right to a speedy public trial, with an attorney present, before an impartial jury; and protection against “cruel and unusual” punishments. The Tenth Amendment addressed the widespread demand that powers not delegated to the national government “are reserved to the States respectively, or to the people.” The amendments were written in broad language that seemed to exclude no one. In fact, however, they technically applied only to p ­ roperty-​­owning white males. Native Americans were entirely outside the constitutional system, an “alien people” in their own land. And, like the Constitution itself, the Bill of Rights gave no protections to enslaved Americans. Instead, they were governed by state “slave codes.” They had no access to the legal system; they could not go to court, make contracts, or own property. Similar restrictions applied to women, who could not vote in most state and national elections. Equally important, the Bill of Rights had a b ­ uilt-​­in flaw: it did not protect citizens from states violating their civil rights.

 religious freedom

 The debates over the Constitution and the Bill of Rights generated a religious revolution as well as a political revolution.

 Hamilton’s Vision of a C ­ apitalist America  273

 Unlike the New England Puritans whose colonial governments enforced their particular religious beliefs, the Christian men who drafted and amended the Constitution made no direct mention of God. They were determined to protect religious life from government interference and coercion. In contrast to the monarchies of Europe, the United States would keep the institutions of church and government separate and allow people to choose their own religions (“freedom of conscience”). To that end, the First Amendment declared that “Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion or prohibiting the free exercise thereof.” This statement has since become one of the most ­important—​­and ­controversial—​­principles of American government. The United States was virtually alone among nations in not designating a single “established” national religion funded by the government. France, Spain, and Italy were officially Catholic nations; Great Britain was Anglican. In addition, when the Bill of Rights was ratified, all but two s­ tates—​­New York and V ­ irginia—​ ­still supported an official religion or maintained a religious requirement for holding political office. Dissenters (the members of other churches or nonbelievers) were tolerated but were prohibited from voting or holding political office. The First Amendment was intended to create a framework within which people of all religious persuasions could flourish. It prohibited the federal government from endorsing or supporting any individual denomination or interfering with the religious choices that people make. As Thomas Jefferson later explained, the First Amendment erected a “wall of separation between church and State.”

 Hamilton’s Vision of a ­C apitalist America In 1776, the same year that Americans were declaring their independence, Adam Smith, a Scottish philosopher, published a revolutionary book titled An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations. It provided the first full description of a modern capitalist economy and its social benefits. Like the American Revolution, The Wealth of Nations was a declaration of independence from Great Britain’s mercantilist system. Under mercantilism, national governments had exercised tight controls over economic life. Smith argued that instead of controlling economic activity, governments should allow individuals and businesses to compete freely for profits in the marketplace. Doing so would unleash the energies of the capitalist spirit. Alexander Hamilton greatly admired The Wealth of Nations, and he eagerly took charge of managing the nation’s complicated financial affairs. More than

 274  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 any other American, he grasped both the complex issues of government finance and envisioned what America would become: the world’s most prosperous capitalist nation. Hamilton was a ­self-​­made and self-educated aristocrat. Born out of wedlock in the West Indies, in 1755, he was deserted by his Scottish father and left an orphan at thirteen by the death of his mother. With the help of friends and relatives, he found his way, at age fifteen, to New Jersey in late 1772 before moving a year later to New York City. There he entered King’s College (now Columbia University). When the war with Britain erupted, Hamilton joined the Continental army as a captain at the ripe age of nineteen. After he distinguished himself in the battles of Trenton and Princeton, Hamilton became one of General Washington’s favorite aides. After the war, Hamilton established a thriving legal practice in New York City (a fellow lawyer said he “surpassed all of us in his abilities”), married into a prominent family, and served as a member of the Confederation Congress. During the Revolutionary War, Hamilton had witnessed the ­near-​­fatal weaknesses of the Confederation Congress. Its lack of authority and money almost lost the war. Now, as Treasury secretary, he believed that the federal government should encourage the hustling, bustling, creative spirit that distinguished Americans from other peoples. Hamilton became the foremost advocate for an “energetic government” promoting capitalist development. In contrast to Jefferson, the southern planter, Hamilton, the urban capitalist, believed that the United States was too dependent on agriculture for its economic ­well-​­being. He championed trade, banking, finance, investment, Alexander Hamilton The powerful and manufacturing, as well as bustling Secretary of the Treasury from 1789 to commercial cities, as the most essential 1795. elements of America’s future.

 Hamilton’s Vision of a C ­ apitalist America  275

 hamilton’s economic reforms The United States was born in debt. To fight the war for independence, it had borrowed heavily from the Dutch and the French. Now, after the war, it had to find a way to pay off the debts. Yet there was no national bank, no national currency, and very few mills and factories. In essence, the American republic was bankrupt. It fell to Alexander Hamilton to determine how the debts should be repaid and how the new national government could balance its budget. Governments have four basic ways to pay their bills: impose taxes or fees on individuals and businesses, levy tariffs (taxes on imported goods), borrow money by selling ­interest-​­paying government bonds to investors, and, last but not least, print money. Under Hamilton’s leadership, the United States did all of these ­things—​ ­and more. To raise funds, the new Congress, with Hamilton’s support, enacted ­tariffs of 5 to 10 percent on the value of a wide variety of imported items. ­Tariffs were hotly debated for two reasons: 1) they were the source of most of the federal government’s annual revenue, and, 2) tariffs also “protected” American manufacturers by taxing their foreign competitors, especially those in Britain. By discriminating against imported goods, tariffs enabled American manufacturers to charge higher prices for their products sold in the United States. This penalized consumers, particularly those in the southern states that were most dependent upon imported goods. In essence, tariffs benefited the nation’s young manufacturing sector, most of which was in New England, at the expense of the agricultural sector, since farm produce was rarely imported. Tariff policy soon became an explosive political issue. dealing with debts

 The levying of tariffs marked but one major element in Alexander Hamilton’s ambitious plan to put the new republic on a sound financial footing. In a series of brilliant reports submitted to Congress between January 1790 and December 1791, Hamilton outlined his visionary program for the economic development of the United States. The first of two “Reports on Public Credit” dealt with how the new federal government should refinance the massive debt that the states and the Confederation government had accumulated during the war for independence. Hamilton insisted that the debts be repaid. After all, he explained, a capitalist economy depends upon its integrity and reliability: debts being paid, contracts being enforced, and private property being protected. By selling government bonds to pay the interest due on the huge ­war-​ ­related debts, Hamilton argued, the U.S. government would also give investors

 276  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 (“the monied interest”) a direct stake in the success of the new national government. A ­well-​­managed federal debt, he claimed, would become a “national blessing” by giving investors at home and abroad confidence in the national economy and the integrity of the government. Hamilton also insisted that the federal government pay (“assume”) the state debts from the Revolutionary War because they were in fact a national responsibility; all Americans had benefited from the war for independence. “The debt of the United States,” he stressed, “was the price of liberty.”

 sectional differences Hamilton’s complicated financial proposals created a storm of controversy, in part because many people, then and since, did not understand their complexities. James Madison, who had been Hamilton’s close ally in the fight for the new constitution, broke with him over the federal government “assuming” the states’ debts. Madison, then the most powerful member of the new Congress, was troubled that northern states owed far more debt than southern states. Four states (Virginia, North Carolina, Georgia, and Maryland) had already paid off most of their war debts. The other states had not been as conscientious. Madison’s opposition to Hamilton’s ­debt-​­assumption plan ignited a vigorous debate in Congress. In April 1790, the House of Representatives voted down Hamilton’s “assumption” plan, 32–29. Hamilton did not give up, however. After failing to get a couple of members of Congress to switch their votes, he then hatched an ingenious scheme. In June 1790, Hamilton invited Jefferson and Madison to join him for dinner in New York City. By the end of the evening, the three leaders had reached a famous compromise. First, they agreed that the national capital should move from New York City to Philadelphia for the next ten years. Then, the capital would move to a new city to be built in a “federal district” on the Potomac River between Maryland and Virginia. Hamilton agreed to find the votes in Congress to approve the move in exchange for Madison pledging to find the two votes needed to pass the d ­ ebt-​­assumption plan. The votes in Congress went as planned, and the federal government moved in late 1790 to Philadelphia. Ten years later, the nation’s capital was moved again, this time to the new planned city of Washington, in the federal District of Columbia. More immediately, Hamilton’s ­debt-​­funding scheme proved a success. The new bonds issued by the federal government in 1790 were quickly snatched up by eager investors, thereby providing money to begin paying off the war debts while covering its operating expenses. In addition, Hamilton obtained new loans from European governments.

 Hamilton’s Vision of a C ­ apitalist America  277

 To raise additional government revenue, Hamilton convinced Congress to create an array of excise ­taxes—​­taxes on particular products, such as carriages, sugar, and salt. A 25 percent excise tax on liquor in 1791 would prove to be the most controversial of all, but the excise taxes generated m ­ uch-​­needed revenue. By 1794, the nation had a higher financial credit rating than all the nations of Europe. By making the new nation financially solvent, Hamilton set in motion the greatest economic success story in world history.

 a national bank

 Part of the opposition to Hamilton’s ­ debt-​ ­financing scheme grew out of opposition to Hamilton himself. The brash young Treasury secretary viewed himself as President Washington’s prime minister. That his Department of Treasury had forty staff members while Thomas Jefferson’s State Department had five employees demonstrated the priority that President Washington gave to the nation’s financial situation. Hamilton was on a mission to develop an ­ urban-​­ centered economy anchored in finance and manufacturing. After securing Congressional approval of his d ­ ebt-​­funding scheme, he called for a national bank modeled after the powerful Bank of England. Such a bank, Hamilton believed, would enable much greater “commerce among individuals” and provide a safe place for the federal government’s cash. By their nature, Hamilton explained, banks were essential to a new nation that was short on gold and silver. Banks would increase the nation’s money supply by issuing currency in amounts greater than their actual “reserve”— gold and silver coins and government ­bonds—​­in their vaults. By issuing loans and thereby increasing the amount of money circulating through the economy, banks served as the engines of prosperity: “industry is increased, commodities are multiplied, agriculture and manufactures flourish, and herein consist the true wealth and prosperity” of a “genuine nation.” Hamilton’s idea of a powerful national bank generated intense criticism. Once again, Madison and Jefferson led the opposition, arguing that, since the Constitution said nothing about creating a national bank, the government could not start one. Jefferson also believed that Hamilton’s proposed bank would not help most Americans. Instead, a small inner circle of ­self-​­serving financiers and investors would, over time, exercise corrupt control over Congress. Hamilton, however, had the better of the argument in Congress. Representatives from the northern states voted 33–1 in favor of the national bank; southern congressmen opposed the bank 19–6. The lopsided vote illustrated the growing political division between the North and South in the young nation.

 278  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 The Bank of the United States Proposed by Alexander Hamilton, the national bank opened in Philadelphia in 1791.

 Before signing the bank bill, President Washington sought the advice of his cabinet, where he found an equal division of opinion. The result was the first great debate on constitutional interpretation. Were the powers of Congress only those explicitly stated in the Constitution, or were other powers implied? The argument turned chiefly on Article I, Section 8, which authorized Congress to “make all Laws which shall be necessary and proper for carrying into Execution the foregoing Powers.” Such language left lots of room for disagreement about what was “necessary and proper” and led to a savage confrontation between Jefferson and Hamilton. The Treasury secretary had come to view Jefferson as a man of “profound ambition & violent passions” who was guided by an “unsound & dangerous” agrarian economic philosophy. Secretary of State Jefferson, who despised banks almost as much as he hated the “monarchist” Hamilton, pointed to the Tenth Amendment of the Constitution, which reserves to the states and the people powers not explicitly delegated to Congress. Jefferson argued that a bank might be a convenient aid to Congress in collecting taxes and regulating the currency, but it was not necessary, as Article I, Section 8, specified. In a lengthy 16,000 word report to the president, Hamilton countered that the power to charter corporations was an “implied” power of any government.

 Hamilton’s Vision of a C ­ apitalist America  279

 As he pointed out, the three banks already in existence had been chartered by states, none of whose constitutions specifically mentioned the authority to incorporate banks. Hamilton convinced Washington to sign the bank bill. In doing so, the president had, in Jefferson’s words, opened up “a boundless field of power,” which in coming years would lead to a further broadening of the president’s implied powers, with the approval of the Supreme Court. The new Bank of the United States (B.U.S.) based in Philadelphia had three primary responsibilities: (1) to hold the government’s funds and pay its bills; (2) to provide loans to the federal government and to other banks to promote economic development; and (3) to manage the nation’s money supply by regulating the power of ­state-​­chartered banks to issue paper currency (called banknotes). The B.U.S. could issue national banknotes as needed to address the chronic shortage of gold and silver coins. By 1800, the B.U.S. had branches in four cities and four more were soon to be added. The American financial system was on the verge of becoming the most effective in the world.

 encouraging manufacturing Hamilton’s bold economic vision for the new republic was not yet complete. In the last of his celebrated recommendations to Congress, the “Report on Manufactures,” distributed in December 1791, he set in place the capstone of his design for a modern capitalist economy: the active governmental promotion of new manufacturing and industrial enterprises (mills, mines, and factories). Industrialization, Hamilton believed, would bring diversification to an American economy dominated by agriculture and dangerously dependent on imported British goods; improve productivity through greater use of machinery; provide work for those not ordinarily employed outside the home, such as women and children; and encourage immigration of skilled industrial workers from other nations. To foster industrial development, Hamilton recommended that the federal government increase tariffs on imports, ­three ​­quarters of which came from Britain, while providing financial incentives (called bounties) to key industries making especially needed products such as wool, cotton cloth, and window glass. Such government support, he claimed, would enable new industries to compete “on equal terms” with longstanding European enterprises. Finally, Hamilton asked Congress to fund major transportation improvements, including the development of roads, canals, and harbors for commercial traffic. Few of Hamilton’s ­pro-​­industry ideas were enacted because of strong opposition from Jefferson, Madison, and other southerners. They did not believe the federal government should support particular industries. Hamilton’s proposals, however, provided an arsenal of arguments for the advocates

 280  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 Certificate of the New York Mechanick Society An illustration of the growing diversification of labor, by Abraham Godwin (ca. 1785).

 of manufacturing and ­federally-​­funded transportation projects (called “internal improvements”) in years to come.

 hamilton’s visionary achievements The economic impact of Hamilton’s leadership was monumental. During the 1790s, as the Treasury Department began to pay off the Revolutionary War debts, foreign capitalists and banks invested heavily in the booming American economy, and European nations as well as China began a growing trade with the United States. Economic growth, so elusive in the 1780s, blossomed at the end of the century, as the number of new businesses soared. A Bostonian reported that the nation had never “had a brighter sunshine of prosperity. . . . ​Our agricultural interest smiles, our commerce is blessed, our manufactures flourish.” All was not well, however. By championing the values and institutions of a bustling new capitalist system and the big cities and industries that went along with it, Hamilton upset many people, especially in the agricultural South and along the western frontier. Thomas Jefferson and James Madison had grown increasingly concerned that Hamilton’s ­urban-​­industrial economic program and his political d ­ eal-​­making were threatening American liberties. Hamilton

 Hamilton’s Vision of a C ­ apitalist America  281

 recognized that his successes had led Jefferson and Madison to form a party “hostile to me” and one intent on making Jefferson the next president. The political competition between Jefferson and Hamilton boiled over into a nasty personal feud. Both men were visionaries, but their visions of America’s future could not have been more different. Hamilton saw Britain as the model for the kind of e­ conomy and society he wanted America to develop; Jefferson preferred France. They also had markedly different hopes for the nation’s economic development. Jefferson told President Washington that Hamilton’s efforts to create a Thomas Jefferson A 1791 portrait by capitalist economy would “undermine Charles Willson Peale. and demolish the republic” and c­ reate “the most corrupt government on earth.” Hamilton, he added, was “really a colossus [giant] to the a­ nti-​­republican party.” In turn, Hamilton called the agrarian Jefferson an “intriguing incendiary” who had circulated “unkind whispers” about the Treasury secretary in an effort to “stab me in the dark.” He also accused Jefferson of being an agrarian romantic who failed to see that manufacturing, industry, and banking would drive the economic future of the United States. Jefferson’s spirited opposition to Hamilton’s politics and policies fractured Washington’s cabinet. Jefferson wrote that he and Hamilton “daily pitted in the cabinet like two cocks [roosters].” President Washington, who detested political squabbling, begged them to stop smearing each other with “wounding ­suspicions and irritating charges” and urged them to rise above their “dissensions.” But it was too late: they had become mortal ­enemies—​­as well as the leaders of the first loosely organized political parties, the Federalists and the D ­ emocratic-​­Republicans.

Federalists and Democratic Republicans
 The Federalists were centered in New York and New England. Generally, they feared the excesses of democracy, distrusted the “common people,” and wanted a strong central government led by the wisest and best leaders who would be

 282  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 c­ ommitted to economic growth, social stability, and national defense. What most worried the Federalists, as Alexander Hamilton said, was the “poison” of “democracy.” The people, he stressed, are “turbulent and changing; they seldom judge or determine right [wisely].” By contrast, the Democratic Republicans, led by Thomas Jefferson and James Madison, were most concerned about threats to individual freedoms and states’ rights posed by a strong national government. In July 1789, chaotic violence erupted in France when masses of the working poor, enraged over soaring prices for bread, their primary food, and in part inspired by the American Revolution, revolted against the absolute monarchy of Louis XVI, sending shock waves throughout Europe. The French Revolution captured the imagination of many sympathetic Americans, especially Thomas Jefferson and the Republicans, as royal tyranny was displaced by a democratic republic that gave voting rights to all adult men regardless of how much property they owned. Americans formed ­Democratic-​ ­Republican societies that hosted rallies on behalf of the French Revolution and in support of local Republican candidates. During the 1790s, James Madison assumed leadership of Hamilton’s Republican opponents in Congress.

Foreign and Domestic Crises
 During the fragile infancy of the new nation, George Washington was the only man able to rise above party differences and hold things together. In 1792, he was unanimously reelected to a second term. And he quickly found himself embroiled in the cascading consequences of the French Revolution, which had started in 1789. The turmoil in France threatened to draw the United States into a European war. In 1791, the monarchies of Prussia and Austria had invaded France to stop the revolutionary movement from infecting their absolutist societies. The foreign invaders, however, only inspired the French revolutionaries to greater efforts to use force to spread their ideal of democracy. By early 1793, the most radical of the French revolutionaries, called Jacobins, had executed the king and queen as well as hundreds of aristocrats and priests. The Jacobins not only promoted democracy, religious toleration, and human rights, but they went well beyond the ideals of the American Revolution in supporting social, racial, and sexual equality. Then, on February 1, 1793, the French revolutionary government declared war on Great Britain, thus beginning a conflict that would last ­twenty-​­two years. As the French republic plunged into warfare, the Revolution entered its worst phase, the s­o-​­called Reign of Terror. In 1793–1794, t­housands of

Foreign and Domestic Crises  283


 “­counterrevolutionary” political prisoners and priests were executed, along with many revolutionary leaders. Barbarism ruled the streets of Paris and other major cities. Secretary of State Thomas Jefferson, who loved French culture and democratic ideals, wholeheartedly endorsed the revolution as “the most sacred cause that ever man engaged in.” By contrast, Alexander Hamilton and Vice President John Adams saw the French Revolution as vicious and godless. Such conflicting attitudes over events in Europe transformed the first decade of American politics into one of the most fractious periods in the nation’s h ­ istory—​­an “age of passion.” The European war against revolutionary France tested the ability of the United States to remain neutral in world affairs. Both France and Britain purchased goods from America and each sought to stop the other from trading with the United States, even if it meant attacking U.S. merchant ships. Federalists and Jeffersonian Republicans alike agreed that a naval war with either European power would devastate the American economy. As President Washington began his second term in 1793, he faced an awkward decision. By the 1778 Treaty of Alliance, the United States was a perpetual ally of France. Americans, however, wanted no part of the European war. They were determined to maintain their profitable trade with both sides, although almost 90 percent of U.S. imports came from Britain. Hamilton and Jefferson agreed that entering the European conflict would be foolish. Where they differed was in how best to stay out of the war. Hamilton had a simple answer: declare the military alliance formed with the French during the American Revolution invalid because it had been made with a monarchy that no longer existed. Jefferson preferred to delay, and to use the alliance with France as a bargaining point with the British. In the end, President Washington took a wise middle course. On April 22, 1793, he issued a neutrality proclamation that declared the United States “friendly and impartial toward the belligerent powers” and warned U.S. citizens that they might be prosecuted for “aiding or abetting hostilities” or taking part in other ­un-​­neutral acts. Instead of settling matters in his cabinet, however, Washington’s neutrality proclamation brought to a boil the ugly feud between Jefferson and Hamilton. Jefferson dashed off an angry letter to James Madison, urging his friend to “take up your pen” and cut Hamilton “to pieces” in the newspapers.

 citizen genÊt

 At the same time that President Washington issued the neutrality proclamation, he accepted Secretary of State Jefferson’s argument that the United States should officially recognize the new French revolutionary

 284  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 government (becoming the first nation to do so) and welcome its ambassador to the United States, the cocky, ­twenty-​­nine-​­year-​­old E ­ dmond-​­Charles Genêt. Early in 1793, Citizen Genêt, as he became known, landed at Charleston, South Carolina, to a hero’s welcome. He then openly violated U.S. neutrality by recruiting four American privateers (privately owned warships) to capture English and Spanish merchant vessels. After five weeks in South Carolina, Genêt sailed to Philadelphia, where his reckless efforts to draw America into the war on France’s side embarrassed his friends in the Republican party. When Genêt threatened to go around President Washington and appeal directly to the American people, even Thomas Jefferson disavowed “the French monkey.” In August 1793, Washington, at Hamilton’s urging, demanded that the French government replace Genêt. The growing excesses of the radicals in France were fast cooling U.S. support for the Revolution. Jefferson, however, was so disgusted by his feud with Alexander Hamilton and by Washington’s refusal to support the French that he resigned as secretary of state at the end of 1793 and returned to his Virginia home, eager to be rid of the “hated occupation of politics.” Vice President Adams greeted Jefferson’s departure by saying “good riddance.” President Washington felt the same way. He never forgave Jefferson and Madison for organizing D ­ emocratic-​­Republican societies to oppose his Federalist policies. After accepting Jefferson’s resignation, Washington never spoke to him again.

 jay’s treaty

 Jay’s Treaty A firestorm of controversy greeted Jay’s Treaty in America. Opponents of the treaty rioted and burned Jay in effigy.

During 1794,
 tensions between the United States and Great Britain threatened to renew warfare between the old enemies. The Treaty of Paris (1783) that ended the Revolutionary War had left the western and southern boundaries of the United States in dispute. In addition, in late 1793, British warships violated international law by seizing U.S. merchant ships that carried French goods

Foreign and Domestic Crises  285


 or were sailing for a French port. By early 1794, several hundred American ships had been confiscated, and their crews were given the terrible choice of joining the British navy, a process called “impressment,” or being imprisoned. At the same time, British troops in the Ohio Valley gave weapons to Indians, who in turn attacked American settlers. On April 16, 1794, President Washington sent Chief Justice John Jay to London to settle the major issues between the two nations. Jay agreed to the British demand that America not sell products to France for the construction of warships. Britain also gained trading advantages with the United States while refusing to stop intercepting American merchant ships and “impressing” their sailors. Finally, Jay conceded that the British need not compensate U.S. citizens for the enslaved African Americans who had escaped to the safety of British forces during the Revolutionary War. In return, Jay won three important promises from the British: they would evacuate their six forts in northwest America by 1796, reimburse Americans for the seizures of ships and cargo in 1793–1794, and grant U.S. merchants the right to trade again with the island economies of British West Indies. When the terms of Jay’s Treaty were disclosed, however, many Americans, especially Republicans, were outraged. In Massachusetts, people shouted “Damn John Jay! Damn everyone who won’t damn John Jay!” The ferocious debate over the treaty deepened the division between Federalists and Republicans. Jefferson dismissed Jay’s Treaty as an “infamous act” intended to “undermine the Constitution.” Another prominent Republican offered this toast to President Washington: “May he be damned if he signs Jay’s Treaty.” The uproar created the most serious crisis of Washington’s presidency. Some called for his impeachment. Yet the president, while admitting that the proposed agreement was imperfect, decided that it was the only way to avoid a war with Britain that the United States was bound to lose (the U.S. Army then had only 672 men, and there was no navy). In the end, with Washington’s strong support, Jay’s Treaty barely won the necessary ­two-​­thirds majority in the Senate. Some 80 percent of the votes for the treaty came from New England or the middle Atlantic states; 74 percent of those voting against the treaty were southerners, most of them Jeffersonian Republicans.

 frontier tensions Meanwhile, new conflicts erupted in the Ohio Valley between American settlers and Native Americans. In the fall of 1793, Revolutionary War hero General “Mad” Anthony Wayne led a military expedition into the Northwest Territory’s “Indian Country.” They marched north from Cincinnati, built Fort Greenville, in western Ohio, and soon went on the offensive in what became known as the Northwest Indian War, a conflict that

 286  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

TREATY OF GREENVILLE, 1795
Lake Michigan 
 e Lak

Fallen Timbers


 e Eri

 er

Chicago


Detroit


 ve r h Ri as b a W

M


 e au m

 eR

 iv

 PENNSYLVANIA e ty Lin

 rea ville T Green

 er

Fort Greenville


Riv


 re

Little
 at K Kanawha River a a R wh na

 ky ntuc Ke

Riv
 e

G


Ohio


Vincennes


 r

 VIRGINIA

 i

 r ve

 KENTUCKY rland Riv mbe er Cu

NORTH CAROLINA

Area of map


■




100 Miles


100 Kilometers


 Indian cessions

 Why did General Anthony Wayne build Fort Greenville?

 WWN64 ■ What happened at the Battle of Fallen Timbers? Figure M6_4 ■ What were the terms of the Treaty of Greenville? First proof 23p0 x 22p0

 arose after the British transferred the Ohio Country to the United States. The Native Americans living in the region insisted that the British had no right to give away their ancestral lands. As pioneers moved into the Northwest Territory, the various Indian nations formed the Western Confederacy to resist American settlement. In August 1794, the Western Confederacy of some 2,000 Shawnee, Ottawa, Chippewa, Delaware, and Potawatomi warriors, supported by the British and reinforced by Canadian militiamen, engaged General Wayne’s troops and Indian allies in the Battle of Fallen Timbers, along the M ­ ichigan-​­Ohio border. The Americans decisively defeated the Indians, destroyed their crops and villages, and built a line of forts in northern Ohio and Indiana, one of which became the city of Fort Wayne, Indiana. The Indians finally agreed to the Treaty of Greenville, signed in

Foreign and Domestic Crises  287


 August 1795, by which the United States bought most of the territory that would form the state of Ohio and the cities of Detroit and Chicago.

 the whiskey rebellion Soon after the Battle of Fallen Timbers, the Washington administration displayed another show of strength in the backcountry, this time against the ­so-​­called Whiskey Rebellion. Alexander Hamilton’s 1791 federal tax on “distilled spirits” had ignited resentment and resistance throughout the western frontier. Liquor made from grain or fruit was the rural region’s most valuable product; it even was used as a form of currency. When protesters’ efforts to repeal the tax failed, many turned to violence and intimidation. Beginning in September 1791, angry groups of farmers, militiamen, and laborers attacked federal tax collectors and marshals. In the summer of 1794, the discontent exploded into open rebellion in western Pennsylvania, home to a fourth of the nation’s whiskey stills. The rebels threatened to assault nearby Pittsburgh, loot the homes of the rich, and set the town ablaze. After negotiations failed, a U.S. Supreme Court justice declared on August 4, 1794, that western Pennsylvania was in a “state of ­rebellion.” It

 Whiskey Rebellion George Washington as commander in chief reviews the troops mobilized to quell the Whiskey Rebellion in Pennsylvania in 1794.

 288  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 was the first great domestic challenge to the federal government since the Constitution was ratified, and George Washington responded decisively. At the urging of Alexander Hamilton, Washington ordered the whiskey rebels to disperse by September 1 or he would send in the militia. When the rebels failed to respond, some 12,500 militiamen from several states began marching to western Pennsylvania to suppress the rebellion. President Washington donned his military uniform and rode on horseback to greet the soldiers. It was the first and last time that a sitting president would lead troops in the field. PINCKNEY’S TREATY, 1795 VIRGINIA

Te
 nn es s

 iv e

Ri
 b e rland

 r ive ee R

NORTH CAROLINA

 TENNESSEE

Mi
 ss iss ip

 pi R

 um

C


 r

 LOUISIANA (Spanish)

 ver

 KENTUCKY

SOUTH CAROLINA

 t Riv r e

 iver aR

31°


31°


 FLORIDA (Spanish) New Orleans

GULF OF MEXICO
Area claimed by Spain after 1793 Line of Pinckney’s Treaty, 1795 ■ ■ 


 What were the terms of Pinckney’s Treaty? Why was the treaty popular?

WWN64
Figure M6_5 First proof 23p0 x 24p0 


Charleston


Savannah


Fl
 in

A la b
 am

 GEORGIA

100 Miles


100 Kilometers


St. Augustine


Western Settlement  289


 The huge army, commanded by Virginia’s governor, Henry “Lighthorse Harry” Lee, quickly panicked the whiskey rebels, who vanished into the hills. Two dozen were charged with high treason; two were sentenced to hang, only to be pardoned by President Washington. The new federal government had made its point and showed its strength. The show of force led the rebels and their sympathizers to change their tactics. Rather than openly defying federal laws, they voted for Republicans, who won heavily in the next Pennsylvania elections.

 pinckney’s treaty While the turbulent events were unfolding in Pennsylvania, the Spanish began negotiations over control of the Mississippi River as well as the disputed northern boundary of their Florida colony, which they had acquired from the British at the end of the Revolutionary War. U.S. negotiator Thomas Pinckney pulled off a diplomatic triumph in 1795 when he convinced the Spanish to accept a southern American boundary at the 31st parallel in west Florida, along the northern coast of the Gulf of Mexico (the current boundary between Florida and Georgia). The Spanish also agreed to allow Americans to ship goods, grains, and livestock down the Mississippi River to ­Spanish-​­controlled New Orleans. Senate ratification of Pinckney’s Treaty (also called the Treaty of San Lorenzo) came quickly, for westerners were eager to transport their crops and livestock to New Orleans.

Western Settlement
 The treaties signed by John Jay and Thomas Pinckney spurred a new wave of settlers into the western territories. Their lust for land aroused a raging debate in Congress over what the federal government should do with the vast areas it had acquired or taken from the British, the Spanish, and from Native Americans.

 land policy

 Federalists and Republicans differed sharply on federal land policy. Federalists wanted the government to charge high prices for western lands to keep the East from losing both political influence and a labor force important to the growth of manufactures. They also preferred that ­government-​­owned lands be sold in large parcels to speculators, rather than in small plots to settlers. Thomas Jefferson and James Madison were reluctantly prepared to go along with such land policies for the sake of reducing the national debt, but Jefferson preferred that g­ overnment-​­owned land be sold to farmers rather than speculators.

 290  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 The prevalence of agriculture This American folk painting by Edward Hicks shows the residence of David Twining, a Pennsylvania farmer, as it appeared in 1787.

 For the time being, however, the Federalists prevailed. With the Land Act of 1796, Congress doubled the price of federal land (public domain) to $2 per acre. Half the townships would be sold in 640-acre sections, making the minimum cost $1,280, a price well beyond the means of ordinary settlers. By 1800, federal land offices had sold fewer than 50,000 acres. Criticism of the land policies led to the Land Act of 1800, which reduced the minimum parcel to 320 acres and spread payments over four years. Thus, with a down payment of $160, one could buy a farm.

 the wilderness road

 The lure of western lands led thousands of settlers to follow pathfinder Daniel Boone into the territory known as K ­ entucky, or Kaintuck, from the Cherokee name K ­ EN-​­TA-​­KE (Great Meadow). In the

Western Settlement  291


 late eighteenth century, the ­ Indian-​ ­held lands in Kentucky were a farmer’s dream and a hunter’s paradise. The vast area boasted fertile soil; bluegrass meadows; abundant forests; and countless buffalo, deer, and wild turkeys. Born on a small farm in 1734 in central Pennsylvania, Boone was a deadeye marksman by the age of twelve who became an experienced farmer and an accomplished woodsman. After hearing numerous reports about the fertile lands over the Appalachian Mountains, Boone set out in 1769 to find a trail into Kentucky. He discovered what Daniel Boone Escorting Settlers was called the Warriors’ Path, a narrow through the Cumberland Gap foot trail that buffalo, deer, and Native Painting by George Caleb Bingham. Americans had worn along the steep ridges over the centuries. In 1773, Boone led a group of white settlers into Kentucky. Two years later, he and thirty woodsmen used axes to widen the 208-­mile-​­long Warriors’ Path into what became known as the Wilderness Road, a rough passageway that more than 300,000 settlers would use over the next t­wenty-​­five years. At a point where a branch of the Wilderness Road intersected with the Kentucky River, near what is now Lexington, Boone built the settlement of Boonesborough. In 1780, Kentucky was divided into three counties and integrated into the state of Virginia. In 1792, it became a separate state. In the process of settling Kentucky, Boone became one of America’s first folk heroes, a ­larger-​­than-​­life figure known as the “Columbus of the Woods.” As he admitted, however, “many heroic actions and chivalrous adventures are related of me which exist only in the regions of fancy. With me the world has taken great liberties, and yet I have been but a common man.” A steady stream of settlers, mostly ­Scots-​­Irish migrants from Pennsylvania, Virginia, and North Carolina, poured into Kentucky during the last quarter of the eighteenth century. The pioneers came on foot or horseback, often leading a mule or a cow that carried their tools and other possessions. Near a creek or spring they would buy a parcel or stake out a claim and mark its boundaries by chopping notches into “witness trees.” They would then build a l­ean-​­to for temporary shelter and clear the land for planting. The larger t­ rees—​­those that could not be felled with an a­ x—​­were girdled: a cut would be made around the

 292  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 trunk, and the tree would be left to die. Because clearing trees often took years, a farmer had to hoe and plant a field filled with stumps. The pioneers grew melons, beans, turnips, and other vegetables, but corn was the preferred crop because it kept well and had so many uses. Ears were roasted and eaten on the cob, and kernels were ground into meal for making mush, hominy grits, and hoecakes, or johnnycakes (dry flour cakes, suitable for travelers, that were originally called journeycakes). Pigs provided pork, and cows supplied milk, butter, and cheese. Many frontier families also built crude stills to manufacture a potent whiskey they called corn likker.

Transfer of Power
 In 1796, President Washington decided that two terms in office were enough. Weary of the increasingly bitter criticism directed at him, he was eager to retire to his plantation at Mount Vernon. He would leave behind a formidable record of achievement: the organization of a new national government, a prosperous economy, the recovery of territory from Britain and Spain, a stable northwestern frontier, and the admission of three new states: Vermont (1791), Kentucky (1792), and Tennessee (1796).

 washington’s farewell

On September 17, 1796, Washington
 delivered a farewell address in which he criticized the rising spirit of political partisanship and the emergence of political parties. They endangered the republic, he felt, because they pursued the narrow interests of minorities rather than the good of the nation. In foreign relations, Washington advised, the United States should stay away from Europe’s quarrels by avoiding “permanent alliances with any portion of the foreign world.” His warning against permanent foreign entanglements would serve as a fundamental principle in U.S. foreign policy until the early twentieth century.

 the election of 1796 With Washington out of the race, the United States had its first contested election for president. The Federalist “caucus,” a group of leading congressmen, chose Vice President John Adams as their presidential candidate. Thomas Pinckney of South Carolina, fresh from his diplomatic triumph in Spain, also ran as a Federalist presidential candidate. As expected, the Republicans chose Thomas Jefferson. Aaron Burr, a young New York attorney and senator who was distrusted by many and disliked by most, also ran as a Republican. The campaign of 1796 was mean and nasty. The Federalists were attacked for unpopular taxes, excessive spending, and abuses of power. Republicans called the pudgy John Adams “His Rotundity” and labeled him a monarchist

The Adams Administration  293


Mount Vernon George Washington and the Marquis de Lafayette at Mount Vernon in
 1784. Washington enlarged the estate, which overlooks the Potomac River, to nearly 8,000 acres, dividing it among five farms.

 because he loved the symbols of power and despised “the people.” (Adams wanted people to refer to the president as “His Highness.”) Federalists countered that Jefferson was a ­French-​­loving atheist eager for another war with Great Britain and charged that the philosophical Virginian was not decisive enough to be president. Adams won the election with 71 electoral votes, but in an odd twist, Jefferson who received 68 electoral votes, became vice president. The Federalists won control of both houses of Congress.

The Adams Administration
 Vain and prickly, opinionated and stubborn, John Adams had long lusted for the presidency, but he was a much better political theorist than he was a political leader. An independent thinker with a proud, combative spirit and volcanic temper, he fought as often with his fellow Federalists, especially Alexander Hamilton, as he did with his Republican opponents. Benjamin Franklin said Adams was “always an honest man, often a wise one, but sometimes . . . ​absolutely out of his senses.” Adams had crafted a distinguished career as a Massachusetts lawyer, and as a leader in the Revolutionary movement. Widely recognized as the ­hardest-​ ­working member of the Continental Congress, he had also authored the Massa-

 294  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 John Adams Political philosopher and politician, Adams was the first president to take up residence in the new White House, in the new national capital of Washington, D.C., in 1801.

 chusetts state constitution. During the Revolution, Adams had served as an exceptional diplomat in France, Holland, and Great Britain, and he had been George Washington’s vice president. In contrast to the tall, lanky Jefferson, the short, stocky Adams feared democracy and despised equality, both of which, he believed, must be kept within bounds by wise leaders. He once referred to ordinary Americans as making up the “common herd of mankind.” Adams also felt that he was never properly ­appreciated—​­and he may have been right. Yet on the essential issue of his presidency, war and peace, he kept his head when others about him were losing ­ theirs—​­ probably at the cost of his reelection.

 the war with france As America’s second president, John Adams inherited a “Quasi War” with France, a b ­ y-​­product of the angry French reaction to Jay’s Treaty between the United States and Great Britain. The navies of both nations were capturing U.S. ships headed for the other’s ports. By the time of Adams’s inauguration, in 1797, the French had plundered some 300 American vessels and broken diplomatic relations with the United States. Adams sought to ease tensions by sending three prominent Americans to Paris to negotiate a settlement. When the U.S. diplomats arrived, however, they were accosted by three French officials (labeled X, Y, and Z by Adams in his report to Congress) who announced that negotiations could begin only if the United States paid a bribe of $250,000 and loaned France $12 million. Such bribes were common i­n the eighteenth ​­century, but the answer from the American side was “no, no, not a sixpence.” When the ­so-​­called XYZ Affair became public, American hostility toward France soared. Many ­Republicans—​ ­with the exception of Vice President Thomas ­Jefferson—​­joined with Federalists in calling for war. Federalists in Congress voted to triple the size of the army and construct warships. President Adams asked George Washington to put on his military uniform and become commander of the army again.

The Adams Administration  295


 Conflict with France A cartoon indicating the ­anti-​­French sentiment generated by the XYZ Affair. The three American negotiators (at left) reject the Paris Monster’s demand for bribery money before discussions could begin.

 He reluctantly agreed on the condition that Hamilton be appointed a major ­general. By the end of 1798, French and American ships were engaged in an undeclared naval war in the Caribbean Sea.

 the war at home

 The naval conflict with France sparked an intense debate between Federalists eager for a formal declaration of war and Republicans sympathetic to France. Amid the superheated emotions, Vice President Jefferson observed that a “wall of separation” had come to divide the nation’s political leaders. He told a French official that President Adams was “a vain, irritable, stubborn” man. For his part, Adams had tried to take the high ground. Soon after his election, he had invited Jefferson to join him in creating a bipartisan administration. Jefferson refused, saying that he would not be a part of the cabinet but instead would only preside over the Senate as vice president, as the Constitution specified. Within a year, he and Adams were at each other’s throats. Adams regretted losing Jefferson as a friend but “felt obliged to look upon him as a man whose mind is warped by prejudice.” Jefferson, he claimed, had

 296  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 become “a child and the dupe” of the Republican faction in Congress led by James Madison. Jefferson and other Republicans were convinced that the real purpose of the French crisis was to provide Federalists with an excuse to quiet their American critics. The Alien and Sedition Acts (1798) seemed to confirm the Republicans’ suspicions. These partisan acts, passed amid a wave of patriotic war fervor, gave the president extraordinary powers to violate civil liberties in an effort to stamp out criticism of the administration. They limited freedom of speech and of the press, as well as the liberty of “aliens” (immigrants who had not yet gained citizenship). Adams’s support of the Alien and Sedition Acts (“war measures”) would prove to be the greatest mistake of his presidency. Timothy Pickering, his secretary of state, claimed that Adams agreed to the acts without consulting “any member of the government and for a reason truly ­remarkable—​­because he knew we should all be opposed to the measure.” Three of the four Alien and Sedition Acts reflected hostility to French and Irish immigrants, many of whom had become militant Republicans in America. The Naturalization Act lengthened from five to fourteen years the residency requirement for U.S. citizenship. The Alien Act empowered the president to deport “dangerous” aliens, and the Alien Enemies Act authorized the president in wartime to expel or imprison enemy aliens at will. Finally, the Sedition Act outlawed writing, publishing, or speaking anything of “a false, scandalous and malicious” nature against the government or any of its officers. Of the ten people convicted under the Sedition Act, all were Republicans, including newspaper editors. To offset the “reign of witches” unleashed by the Alien and Sedition Acts, Jefferson and Madison drafted the Kentucky and Virginia Resolutions, passed by the legislatures of those two states in late 1798. The resolutions denounced the Alien and Sedition Acts as “alarming infractions” of constitutional rights and put forth the shocking idea that state legislatures should “nullify” (reject and ignore) acts of Congress that violated the constitutional guarantee of free speech. In attacking the Alien and Sedition Acts, Jefferson was suggesting something more dangerous: disunion. George Washington told Patrick Henry in Virginia that Jefferson was threatening to “dissolve the union.” While Adams and Jefferson were waging their war of words, the president was seeking peace with France. In 1799, he dispatched another team of diplomats to negotiate with a new French government under First Consul Napoléon Bonaparte, the “general on horseback” whose army had overthrown the republic. In a treaty called the Convention of 1800, the Americans won the best terms they could from the French. They dropped their demands to

The Adams Administration  297


 be repaid for the ships taken by the French, and the French agreed to end the military alliance with the United States dating back to the Revolutionary War. The Senate quickly ratified the agreement, which became effective on December 21, 1801.

 republican victory in 1800

 The furor over the Alien and Sedition Acts influenced the pivotal presidential election of 1800. The Federalists nominated Adams, even though many of them continued to snipe at him and his policies, especially his refusal to declare war against France. Alexander Hamilton publicly questioned Adams’s fitness to be president, citing his “disgusting egotism.” Thomas Jefferson and Aaron Burr, the Republican candidates, once again represented the alliance of the two most powerful states, Virginia and New York. The Federalists claimed that Jefferson’s election would bring civil war and anarchy to America. Jefferson’s supporters portrayed him as a passionate idealist and optimist who was a friend of farmers and a courageous champion of states’ rights, a limited federal government, and personal liberty. In the important election of 1800, Jefferson and Burr, the two Republicans, emerged with 73 electoral votes each. Federalist John Adams received only 65. When Burr shockingly refused to withdraw his candidacy in favor of Jefferson, the tie vote in the Electoral College sent the election into the House of Representatives (a constitutional defect corrected in 1804 by the Twelfth Amendment). Hamilton grudgingly preferred Jefferson over Burr (who would later kill Hamilton in a duel). Jefferson, Hamilton said, “is by far not so dangerous a man; he has pretensions to character.” As to Burr, Hamilton added, “there is nothing in his favor.” The tie vote in the Electoral College between Thomas Jefferson and Aaron Burr created an explosive political crisis. Federalist Fisher Ames predicted that Burr “might impart vigor to the country,” while Jefferson “was absurd enough to believe his own nonsense.” The ­rumor-​­filled three months between the House vote for president in December 1800 and Thomas Jefferson’s inauguration in March 1801 were so tense that people talked openly of civil war. “The crisis is momentous!” warned the Washington Federalist. There were even wild rumors of plots to assassinate Jefferson. In the end, it took t­ hirty-​­six ballots for the House of Representatives to choose Jefferson over Burr as the new president. Before the Federalists turned over power on March 4, 1801, President Adams and Congress passed the Judiciary Act of 1801. It was intended to ensure Federalist control of the judicial system by creating sixteen federal circuit courts, with a new judge for each. It also reduced the number of Supreme

 298  CHAPTER 6  Strengthening the New Nation

 Court justices from six to five in an effort to deprive the next president of appointing a new member. Before he left office, Adams appointed ­Federalists to all the new positions. The Federalists, quipped Jefferson, had “retired into the judiciary as a stronghold.” They never again would exercise significant political power.

 a new era

 The election of 1800 did not resolve the fundamental political tensions that had emerged between ardent nationalists like Adams and Hamilton and those like Jefferson and Madison who clung to ideals of states’ rights and an ­agriculture-​­based economy. In fact, the 1800 election further divided the young republic into warring political factions and marked a major turning point in the nation’s history. It was the first time that one political party had relinquished presidential power to the opposition party, and it was the only election that pitted a sitting president (Adams) against his own vice president (Jefferson). Jefferson’s ­hard-​­fought victory signaled the emergence of a new, more democratic political culture dominated by bitterly divided parties and wider public THE ELECTION OF 1800

 NH 6 VT 4

INDIANA TERR.
Electoral Vote Thomas Jefferson (Republican) Aaron Burr (Republican) John Adams (Federalist) Charles C. Pinckney (Federalist) 
 MA 16 TERR. NW OF OHIO R.

64*




 PA



 VA

73†
73†


 NY 12

 KY 4 TN 3 GA

 NC 8 4 SC

 RI 4 CT 9 NJ 7 DE 3 MD R 5 F 5

 * One Rhode Island elector cast one of his ballots for John Jay. †

■
■
■


 Tie resolved by House of Representatives; Jefferson elected.

 Why was the election of 1800 a key event in American history? What voting patterns emerged in the election of 1800? WWN64 HowFigure did Congress M6_6 break the tie between Thomas Jefferson and Aaron Burr? First proof 31p0 x 18p6

The Adams Administration  299


 participation. Before and immediately after independence, people took a keen interest in public affairs, but socially prominent families, the “rich, the able, and the wellborn,” still dominated political life. However, the raging political battles of the late 1790s, culminating in 1800 with Jefferson’s election, established the right of “common” men to play a more active role in governing the young republic. With the gradual elimination of the requirement that citizens must own property to vote, the electorate expanded enormously in the early nineteenth century. Jefferson called his election the “Revolution of 1800,” for it marked the triumph of the Republican party and the slaveholding South at the expense of the New England Federalists. Three Virginia Republican ­slaveholders—​­Jefferson, James Madison, and James M ­ onroe—​­would hold the presidency for the next t­ wenty-​­four years. A bitter John Adams was so upset by his defeat (as well as by the death of his alcoholic son Charles) that he refused to participate in Jefferson’s inauguration in the new federal capital in Washington, D.C. Instead, unnoticed and unappreciated, Adams boarded a stagecoach at 4 a.m. for the 500-mile trip to his home in Massachusetts. He and Jefferson would not communicate for the next twelve years. As Adams returned to work on his Massachusetts farm with his wife, Abigail, he told his eldest son, John Quincy, who would become the nation’s sixth president, that anyone governing the United States “has a hard, laborious, and unhappy life.” The victorious Jefferson would soon feel the same way.

CHAPTER REVIEW
Summary • 
 Confederation Government Despite its many weaknesses, the national government created by the Articles of Confederation managed to construct impor­ tant alliances during the Revolutionary War, help win the War of Independence, and negotiate the Treaty of Paris (1783). It created executive departments and established, through the Northwest Ordinance, the process by which new western territories would be organized and governments formed before they applied for statehood. Yet the Articles of Confederation did not allow the national government to raise taxes to fund its debts. Shays’s Rebellion made many Americans fear that such uprisings would eventually destroy the new republic unless the United States formed a stronger national government.

•


 Constitutional Convention Delegates gathered at the convention in Philadelphia in 1787 to revise the existing government, but almost immediately they decided to scrap the Articles of Confederation and start over. An entirely new document emerged, which created a system called federalism in which a strong national government with clear separation of powers among executive, legislative, and judicial branches functioned alongside state governments with clearly designated responsibilities. Arguments about how best to ensure that the rights of individual states were protected and also that “the people” were represented in the new Congress were resolved by establishing a Senate, with equal representation for each state, and a House of Representatives, the number of whose delegates was determined by population counts.

•


 Ratification of the Constitution Ratification of the Constitution was hotly contested. ­Anti-​­Federalists, such as Virginia’s Patrick Henry, opposed the new structure of government because the absence of a bill of rights would lead to a loss of individual and states’ rights. To sway New York State toward ratification, Alexander Hamilton, James Madison, and John Jay wrote The Federalist Papers. Ratification became possible only when Federalists promised to add a Bill of Rights.

•


 Federalists versus Republicans Alexander Hamilton and the Federalists wanted to create a diverse economy in which agriculture was balanced by trade, finance, and manufacturing. Hamilton crafted a federal budget that funded the national debt through tariff and tax revenues, and he created a national bank, the first Bank of the United States. Thomas Jefferson and others, known as Jeffersonian Republicans, worried that Hamilton’s plans violated the Constitution and made the federal government too powerful. They envisioned a nation dominated by farmers and planters where the rights of states would be protected against federal power.

•


 Trouble Abroad During the French Revolution, George Washington’s policy of neutrality violated the terms of the 1778 treaty with France. At the same time, Americans sharply criticized Jay’s Treaty with the British for giving too much away. French warships began seizing British and American ships, and an undeclared war was under way. Federalists supported Washington’s approach, while Republicans



 were more supportive of France. During the presidency of John Adams, the United States fought an undeclared naval war with the French, which led to the controversial Alien and Sedition Acts of 1798.

Chronology
1786–1787


1787–1788










 Articles of Confederation take effect Treaty of Paris ends the War of Independence Shays’s Rebellion Northwest Ordinance The Constitutional Convention is held in Philadelphia The Federalist Papers are published President George Washington is inaugurated Bill of Rights is ratified Bank of the United States is created Washington issues a proclamation of neutrality Jay’s Treaty is negotiated with England Whiskey Rebellion in Pennsylvania U.S. Army defeats Indians in the Battle of Fallen Timbers Treaty of Greenville Pinckney’s Treaty is negotiated with Spain John Adams is elected president Alien and Sedition Acts are passed Thomas Jefferson is elected president

Key Terms
 federalism p. 247

Bill of Rights (1791) p. 272


Articles of Confederation p. 247


Bank of the United States (B.U.S.)
(1791) p. 279


Northwest Ordinance (1787) p. 250
 Shays’s Rebellion (1786–1787) p. 255 separation of powers p. 259 ­anti-​­Federalists p. 264 The Federalist Papers p. 265 Jeffersonian Republicans p. 269

French Revolution p. 282
 Jay’s Treaty (1794) p. 285 Whiskey Rebellion (1794) p. 287 Alien and Sedition Acts (1798) p. 296 election of 1800 p. 297

IJK
Go to InQuizitive to see what you’ve ­learned—​­and learn what you’ve ­missed—​­with personalized feedback along the way. 




The Early
­Republic
1800–1815


 We Owe Allegiance to No Crown (ca. 1814) The War of 1812 generated a renewed spirit of nationalism, inspiring Philadelphia s ­ ign-​­painter John Archibald Woodside to create this patriotic painting.

W


 hen President Thomas Jefferson took office in early 1801, the United States and its western territories reached from the Atlantic Ocean to the Mississippi River. The nation remained primarily rural and agricultural. Nine of ten Americans lived or worked on land, with most of them growing enough food and raising enough livestock to feed their families but rarely producing enough to sell outside the community, much less overseas. That changed during the nineteenth century. With each passing year, more and more farmers began to produce surplus crops and livestock to sell in regional and world markets. Such commercial agriculture was especially evident in the South, where skyrocketing European demand for cotton caused prices to soar. The growing market economy produced the ­boom-​­and-​­bust cycles that have always been a regular element of capitalist economies, but overall the years from 1790 to 1830 were prosperous, with enterprising Americans experiencing unprecedented opportunities for land ownership, economic gain, geographic mobility, and political participation. The desire displayed by Americans for profits was, according to Congressman Henry Clay, “a passion as unconquerable as any with which nature has endowed us. You may attempt to regulate [it]—[but] you cannot destroy it.” Everywhere in the early Republic, it seemed, people were on the move and on the make, leading one newspaper to claim that what made the United States different from other nations was “the almost universal ambition to get forward.” Americans excelled at westward expansion, economic development, rapid population growth, and intense political activity. Former president John Adams observed that “there is no people on earth so ambitious as the people of America . . . ​because the lowest can aspire as freely as the highest.”

 focus questions 1. What were the major domestic political developments that took place during Thomas Jefferson’s administration?

 2. How did foreign events impact the United States during the Jefferson and Madison administrations?

 3. What were the primary causes of the American decision to declare war on Great Britain in 1812?

 4. What were the significant outcomes of the War of 1812 on the United States?



